Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TAXPAYER ASSISTANCE AND TAX CREDIT OUTREACH GRANTS; APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for taxpayer assistance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 270C.21, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for tax credit outreach grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 270C.21, subdivision 4. new text end